District of Columbia statutes.
47-2209

Assumption or refund of tax by vendor unlawful.

The provisions of § 47-2014 are hereby incorporated in and made applicable to this chapter.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 127, ch. 146, title II, § 219
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2209.
1973 Ed., § 47-2709.